Wisconsin, session 2025, SB406.
do enact as follows:SB406,11Section 1. 69.186 (1) (m) of the statutes is created to read:SB406,2,3269.186 (1) (m) The sex of the aborted unborn child if the sex can be 3determined by visual inspection.SB406,24Section 2. 69.186 (1) (n) of the statutes is created to read:SB406,2,6569.186 (1) (n) Whether the aborted unborn child had a fetal anomaly and, if 6so, the nature of the fetal anomaly.SB406,37Section 3. 253.12 (3) (a) 1. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB406,2,128253.12 (3) (a) 1. (intro.) Establish and maintain an up-to-date registry that 9documents the diagnosis in this state of any unborn child who has a fetal anomaly 10or any infant or child who has a birth defect, regardless of the residence of the 11infant or child. The department shall include in the registry information that will 12facilitate all of the following:SB406,413Section 4. 253.12 (3) (a) 1. a. of the statutes is amended to read:SB406,2,1514253.12 (3) (a) 1. a. Identification of risk factors for fetal anomalies and birth 15defects.SB406,516Section 5. 253.12 (3) (a) 5. of the statutes is created to read:SB406,2,1817253.12 (3) (a) 5. Incorporate information reported under s. 69.186 (1) (n) into 18the registry and into any reports and analyses created from the registry.SB406,619Section 6. 253.12 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB406,3,720253.12 (4) (a) Make recommendations to the department regarding the 21establishment of a registry that documents the diagnosis in the state of an unborn 22child who has a fetal anomaly or an infant or child who has a birth defect, as 1required under sub. (3) (a) 1., the specific birth defects for which a report is required 2under sub. (2) on which the council unanimously decides, the rules that the 3department is required to promulgate under sub. (3) (a) 3., and on the general 4content and format of the report under sub. (2) and procedures for submitting the 5report. The council shall also make recommendations regarding the content of a 6report that, because of the application of sub. (2) (d), does not contain the name of 7the subject of the report.SB406,3,88